Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-753
Extradition; civil action; immunity from service of process in certain cases.

A person brought into this state by, or after waiver of, extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to service of personal process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceeding to answer which he is being or has been returned, until he has been convicted in the criminal proceeding, or, if acquitted, until he has had reasonable opportunity to return to the state from which he was extradited.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 25, p. 567.